Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 462.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to any other liability or  penalty provided by law, the Oregon
Racing Commission may impose a civil penalty on a person for any of the following:
(a) Violation of ORS 462.020 (1).
(b) Accepting or facilitating wagers on animal racing, if the person is not  authorized to
do so under this chapter.
(2) The commission shall  adopt rules establishing the civil penalties that may be imposed
under this section. The maximum penalty may not exceed $25,000.
(3) Civil penalties under this section shall  be imposed in the manner provided by ORS
183.745.
(4) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or  reduced upon such
terms and  conditions as the commission considers proper and consistent with the public
good.
(5) In imposing a civil penalty pursuant to this section, the commission shall  consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The  past history of the person incurring a penalty in taking all feasible steps or pro-
cedures necessary or appropriate to correct any violation;
(b) Any prior violations of statute, rules or orders;
(c) The economic and financial conditions of the person incurring the penalty; and
(d) The immediacy and extent to which the violation threatens the public good.
(6) All civil penalties recovered under  this section shall be deposited in the General Fund
to the credit of the Oregon Racing Commission Account established under ORS 462.260.
Enrolled Senate Bill 854 (SB 854-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 31, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 854 (SB 854-INTRO) Page 2